Utah statutes.
72-7-201.   Purpose.
The regulation of junkyards in areas adjacent to any state highway included in
the national system of interstate and primary highways is a statewide public
purpose and necessary to promote the public safety, health, welfare,
convenience, and enjoyment of public travel, to protect the public investment
in public highways, and to preserve and enhance the scenic beauty of lands
bordering on the highways.
